src-fst-morphology-stems-adjectives.lexc.md
# Adjective classification
Adjectives are words that are inflected like nouns, with few additions. For
adjectives, the comparative derivations are usually allowed and the
possessive suffixes are unlikely. The syntactic adjectives that do not have
comparative derivations are nouns, if they have nominal inflection, or
particles, if they do not inflect. The examples you need to find the 
correct classification are same as for nouns, with addition of comparative
and superlative.

The classification of adjectives combines the stem changes, the final 
allomorph selection and the harmony. See the list from:

* Adjective examples examples:*
* *aakkostettu:* `aakkostettu+A+Sg+Nom`
* *aakkostettuja:* `aakkostettu+A+Pl+Par`
* *aakkostetut:* `aakkostettu+A+Pl+Nom`
* *aakkostetumpi:* `aakkostettu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *aakkostetumpina:* `aakkostettu+A+Comp+Pl+Ess`
* *aakkostetuin:* `aakkostettu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`
* *aakkostetuimmat:* `aakkostettu+A+Superl+Pl+Nom`

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
